Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-263
Towns; actions against; service of process; defense.

In all legal proceedings against the town by name, the first process and all other writs or proceedings required to be served shall be served in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action, and whenever any suit or proceedings shall be commenced against the town, it shall be the duty of the town clerk to attend to the defense thereof, and lay before the electors of the town, at the first town meeting, a full statement of such suit or proceedings for their consideration and direction.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 63, p. 149;

R.S.1913, § 1047;

C.S.1922, § 949;

C.S.1929, § 26-263;

R.S.1943, § 23-263;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 12.

For service of summons in a civil action, see section 25-505.01.